Washington statutes.
RCW 43.362.070

Quantitative and qualitative performance measures—Reporting—Posting on website.

The department will develop quantitative and qualitative performance measures for monitoring the regional transfer of development rights program. The performance measures may address conservation of land and creation of compact communities, as well as other measures identified by the department. The department may require cities, towns, and counties to report on these performance measures biannually. The department shall compile any performance measure information that has been reported by the counties, cities, and towns and post it on a website.

[ 2009 c 474 s 7.]